Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
SPECIAL LEGISLATIVE ELECTION PROCEDURE -
MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY

1-11-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Section 10 of article V of the Colorado constitution provides that each house of the general assembly shall judge the election and qualification of its members;

Section 11 of article VII of the Colorado constitution authorizes the general assembly to pass laws to secure the purity of elections;

In furtherance of these constitutional provisions and the plenary power of the general assembly, the general assembly may enact laws to enable a house of the general assembly to call a special legislative election in the event such house is unable to declare a person duly elected in a district as a member of the state senate or the state house of representatives because an accurate and verifiable vote count showing that the person has the highest number of votes cast in such district cannot be obtained from the general election returns.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1386, § 4, effective June 4.

1-11-302. Causes of special legislative election.

The state senate or the state house of representatives, acting by resolution, may call a special legislative election for a state senate or house of representatives district following any general election pursuant to this part 3 if:

The election of any person as a member of the state senate or the state house of representatives is contested pursuant to section 1-11-208; and

A committee on credentials, a committee of reference, or an administrative law judge pursuant to section 1-11-208.5 recommends a special legislative election.

Such resolution shall direct the secretary of state to give notice to the county clerk and recorder of each county in which such district is located to call a special legislative election for the entire district pursuant to section 1-11-303. Such resolution shall further specify that the candidates at such election shall, subject to the withdrawal of a candidate pursuant to section 1-11-306, be the same as the candidates on the ballot in such district for the state senate or the state house of representatives seat at the preceding general election from which the election contest arises.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1387, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2016:

IP(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 587, § 63, effective May 18.

1-11-303. Call for special legislative election.

Within three days after receipt of a resolution calling for a special legislative election pursuant to section 1-11-302, the secretary of state shall make and deliver or transmit to the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the district for the contested state senate or house of representatives seat is located a written notice calling a special legislative election in said district. The secretary of state shall further specify the name and party of each candidate and the district number of the contested state senate or house of representatives seat. Except as otherwise provided in section 1-11-306, candidates shall be the same as the candidates on the ballot in such district for the state senate or house of representatives at the preceding general election from which the contest was filed pursuant to section 1-11-208.

A special legislative election called pursuant to this section shall be held in the entire district for the contested state senate or state house of representatives seat and no precinct or precincts in the district may be excluded from such election.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1387, § 4, effective June 4.

1-11-304. Date of election.

Within three days after receipt of the secretary of state's notice pursuant to section 1-11-303, the county clerk and recorder or coordinated election official shall set a date for the special legislative election that is not less than forty-five days nor more than sixty days from the date of such receipt.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1387, § 4, effective June 4.

1-11-305. Notice of special legislative election.

The county clerk and recorder shall give notice of the special legislative election pursuant to section 1-5-205.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1388, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 587, § 64, effective May 18.

1-11-306. Withdrawal from special legislative election.

A candidate on the ballot at the special legislative election may withdraw his or her candidacy at any time after the notice of special legislative election given under section 1-11-305. The special legislative election shall be called and held notwithstanding such withdrawal; except that, if, at the close of business on the tenth day before such election, there is not more than one candidate on the ballot by reason of such withdrawal, the designated election official shall cancel the election and declare the candidate elected. Notice of such cancellation shall be made as provided in section 1-5-208 (6).

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1388, § 4, effective June 4.

1-11-307. Conduct of special legislative election.

The special legislative election shall be conducted according to the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of this title.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1388, § 4, effective June 4.

1-11-308. Mail-in ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1388, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1796, § 63, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-11-309. Early voting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1388, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-11-310. Survey of returns.

The board of canvassers for a special legislative election shall be organized as provided in section 1-10-101.

The county clerk and recorder shall contact the secretary of state on election night with the unofficial count.

The board of canvassers for a special legislative election shall commence a survey of the returns on the day following such election.

The certified survey of returns shall be sent by certified mail or hand delivered to the secretary of state no later than the close of business on the fifth day after the special legislative election.

Upon receipt of the certified survey of returns, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of election to the candidate who received the highest number of votes and shall transmit a copy of the certificate to the appropriate house of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1388, § 4, effective June 4.

1-11-311. Special legislative elections subject to "Fair Campaign Practices Act".

Special legislative elections conducted in accordance with this part 3 are subject to the appropriate sections of article 45 of this title.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1389, § 4, effective June 4.